Hawaii statutes.
§174C-43 Investigations required.
Before any proposed water management area is designated by the commission, the
chairperson may conduct, cooperate with the appropriate federal or county water
agency in conducting, or administer contracts for the conduct of, any
scientific investigation or study deemed necessary for the commission to make a
decision to designate a water management area. In connection with such
investigation or study, the chairperson from time to time may require reports
from water users as to the amount of water being withdrawn and as to the manner
and extent of the beneficial use. Such reports shall be made on forms
furnished by the commission. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 197, §5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next